Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.580

Waterworks—Procedure—Bonds.

For the purpose of providing for, constructing and maintaining such waterworks for irrigation and domestic purposes and issuing bonds to pay therefor, such cities and towns may proceed in all ways in accordance with, and apply all the provisions of, law relating to local improvement assessments.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.23.580. Prior: 1901 c 117 s 3; RRS s 9528.]